Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 16

Plant Disease and Pest Control

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

2-16-101. Destruction of trees — Compensation.

The court shall allow from the county general fund such sum as the evidence shows the claimant is entitled to receive.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 247, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 2645, 2646; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-129, 77-130.

2-16-102. Date stamped on cotton insecticides — Penalty.

Each bag or other container that is shipped without first having the date placed on the bag or container shall be a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 458, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-212, 77-213; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 6.

2-16-103. Alligator weed agreements.

The State Plant Board is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States Army Corps of Engineers to hold and save the United States free from claims that may occur from control operations jointly carried on by the board and the United States Army Corps of Engineers, or carried on by the board under financial assistance from the United States Army Corps of Engineers for the control and eradication of alligator weed in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 79, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-139.

2-16-104. Disposition of funds.

All fees, interest, penalties, and costs collected by the State Plant Board as authorized by law shall be deposited into the State Treasury on or before the fifth day of the month next following the month of collection thereof.

Upon receipt of the funds, the Treasurer of State shall, after deducting therefrom the collection charge authorized by law, credit the net amount to the credit of the Plant Board Fund to be used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the board.

All fees, fines, penalties, moneys, and funds arising from all sources resulting from the enforcement, operation, investigation, application, and administration of the laws under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Bureau of Standards of the State Plant Board and the sale of property resulting from said purposes, and all moneys, grants, and other sources of funding procured for the bureau, shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund, or any successor fund, to be used solely for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the bureau.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 417, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-138; Acts 1995, No. 1304, § 4.

2-16-105. Fire Ant Poison Cost Sharing Program.

(1)There is hereby established a program to be known as the “Fire Ant Poison Cost Sharing Program”.

This program shall be administered by the State Plant Board; which shall have the authority to establish the necessary rules and procedures for the administration of the program.

(1)The board shall purchase the necessary chemicals for the eradication of fire ants and distribute such chemicals to the various counties of the state based upon the requests received from eligible purchasers in the county.

The chemicals made available by the board shall become the responsibility of the county judge who shall oversee the safe storage and distribution of such chemicals under the direction of the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service.

(1)It shall be the duty of the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service to collect moneys received from the distribution and sale of such fire ant poison chemicals as determined by the board, and remit such moneys to the board on a monthly basis.

The moneys generated from the sale of fire ant poison chemicals and received by the board from the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Plant Board Fund as a nonrevenue receipt refund to expenditure, there to be used by the board to purchase additional fire ant poison chemicals for distribution to the various counties of the state for fire ant control.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1262, § 2.

2-16-106. Recovery of quarantine costs.

The State Plant Board is empowered to recover any identifiable expenses from the owner or other person in possession or control of the property upon which it enforces, maintains, and administers any quarantine that is imposed due to infestations or infections of insect pests, diseases, or noxious weeds. Whenever the owner or other person cannot be found or shall fail, neglect, or refuse to reimburse the board for incurred quarantine expenses, the board shall have and enforce a lien for such expenses upon the property upon which it enforces, maintains, or administers any quarantine, in the same manner as liens are had and enforced upon property for labor and materials furnished by virtue of contract with the owner.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 783, § 8.

2-16-107. Rules.

The State Plant Board is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules as are necessary to administer the fees, rates, tolls, or charges for services established by §§2-16-407(f),2-17-213,2-17-238,2-19-209(a), and2-19-307(a) and is directed to prescribe and collect such fees, rates, tolls, or charges for the services delivered by the board in such manner as may be necessary to support the programs of the board as directed by the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 783, § 9.

2-16-108. State Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Board” means the State Plant Board; and

“Fund” means the State Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund.

There is created in accordance with §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, 19-4-805, and 19-4-806 and the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-6-101 et seq., a cash fund entitled the State Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, which shall be maintained in such depository bank or banks as may be designated from time to time by the board.

The first two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in each fiscal year of all fees, interest, penalities, and costs collected by the board that constitute the special revenues specified in § 19-6-301(51) and all income, interest, and earnings thereof are declared to be cash funds to be used solely for paying the cost of operations and maintenance of the board and the financing of the acquisition, construction, and maintenance of facilities for the board's operations, including any additions, extensions, and improvements thereto, the renovation thereof, and the equipping of such facilities.

Such cash funds shall not be deemed to be a part of the State Treasury for any purpose, including, without limitation, the provisions of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29, Article 16, § 12, or Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, or any other constitutional or statutory provision.

The fund shall be held and the amounts therein invested by the board in accordance with the laws of the state pertaining to cash funds. The board may also pledge and use moneys in the fund to provide for the repayment of obligations issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority under the State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act of 1991, § 22-3-1401 et seq., to accomplish the purposes specified in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section and to pay the costs and expenses related to the issuance of such obligations.

The provisions of §§ 22-3-1402(c) [repealed] and 22-3-1406 [repealed] shall not be applicable in any respect to the acquisition, construction, extension, or renovation of or the equipping of facilities for the board and shall not under any circumstances constitute a limitation on or prohibition to the financing of the capital improvements by the authority.

On July 30, 1999, all moneys then held in the Plant Board Fund created by § 19-6-408 that were derived from the special revenues described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be transferred to the State Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, except that the amount transferred shall not exceed the maximum amount provided in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was transferred by Acts 2001, No. 1553, § 28 and was formerly codified as §§19-5-1092 —19-5-1094.

Purchased with state moneys, either directly or indirectly; or

Used in a project conducted:

By a state agency, department, board, or commission; or

Under a contract with the State of Arkansas.

Cool seasons variety blends of turf shall be grown from blue tag certified seed under the blue tag certification program of the Association of Official Seed Certifying Agencies.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 317, § 8: Mar. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture and Economic Development and in its place established separate House and Senate Committees; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture and Economic Development and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also [become] effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2019, No. 423, § 2: Mar. 11, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that delay in implementation of this act would hinder the State Plant Board from enforcing egregious violations during the 2019 growing season, which could have a detrimental impact on the state's agricultural economy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 846, § 1; 2001, No. 1553, § 28.

2-16-109. Turf purchased with state moneys — Definition.

As used in this section, “turf” means field-cultivated turf grass sod consisting of grass varieties tested by the National Turfgrass Evaluation Program.

Turf shall be certified by the State Plant Board if the turf is:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1264, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Plant Act of 1917

2-16-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Plant Act of 1917”.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 8024; Pope's Dig., § 12333; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-101.

2-16-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Insect pests and diseases” means insect pests and diseases injurious to plants and plant products of this state including any of the stages of development of such insects and diseases;

“Persons” means individuals, associations, partnerships, and corporations;

“Places” means vessels, cars, other vehicles, buildings, docks, nurseries, orchards, and other premises where plants and plant products are grown, kept, or handled; and

“Plants and plant products” means trees, shrubs, vines, forage, and cereal plants, and all other plants; cuttings, grafts, scions, buds, and all other parts of plants; and fruit, vegetables, roots, bulbs, seeds, wood, lumber, and all other plant products.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 8025; Pope's Dig., § 12334; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-102.

2-16-203. Penalty.

Any person who shall violate any provision or requirement of this subchapter or the rules made or of any notice given under this subchapter or who shall forge, counterfeit, deface, destroy, or wrongfully use any certificate provided for in this subchapter or in the rules made under this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation, and upon conviction he or she shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(i)In a lawful proceeding respecting licensing, as defined in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., in addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action, the State Plant Board may assess a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation of any statute, rule, or order enforceable by the board.

(a)The board may assess a civil penalty greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000) but not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) only if the board finds that a violation under this subdivision (b)(1)(A) is egregious.

A violation is egregious only if the application of one (1) of the following herbicides is used intentionally in violation of the federal labeling requirements or a state law or rule regarding its application:

An auxin-containing herbicide; or

A new herbicide technology released after August 1, 2017.

In no case shall a single application or drift incident by a pesticide applicator be considered multiple violations based on the number of complaints.

In no case shall the failure to meet minimum treating standards, except those that require a termiticide application, be considered a violation and subject to a civil penalty.

(A)The board shall by rule establish a schedule designating the minimum and maximum civil penalty that may be assessed under this section for violation of each statute, rule, or order over which it has regulatory control.

The board may promulgate any other rule necessary to carry out the intent of this section.

In the event of nonpayment of any civil penalty lawfully assessed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the civil penalty shall be recoverable in the name of the state by the Attorney General in Pulaski County Circuit Court or in the circuit court of the county in which the violation occurred.

All sums paid or recovered under this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

Sums collected under special revenue programs shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund.

Sums collected under general services programs shall be deposited into the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account.

All rules promulgated under this section shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development or subcommittees of the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic Development.

Moneys collected through a civil penalty assessed by the board shall be distributed as follows:

For amounts up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), as currently used, including funding for the Arkansas State Plant Board Scholarship program; and

For amounts more than one thousand dollars ($1,000):

The first one thousand dollars ($1,000) of the assessed penalty for scholarships through the Arkansas State Plant Board Scholarship program; and

The remainder divided as follows:

Sixty percent (60%) for scholarships through the Arkansas State Plant Board Scholarship program; and

Forty percent (40%) deposited into the University of Arkansas Fund to be used by the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b)(1)(A) as (b)(1)(A)(i); added (b)(1)(A)(ii); and added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 423 substituted “the application of one (1) of the following herbicides is used intentionally in violation of the federal labeling requirements or a state law or rule regarding its application” for “significant off-target crop damage occurred as a result of the application of” in (b)(1)(A)(ii)(b) ; added the (b)(1)(A)(ii)(b)(1) through (3) designations; and made stylistic changes.

In a prosecution for selling and offering for sale nursery stock infected with a disease in violation of a rule of the State Plant Board, the state was not required to show that the sale was made with knowledge that the trees were so affected. Jacobs v. State, 155 Ark. 95, 243 S.W. 952 (1922).

Arkansas State Plant Board, in a proceeding respecting licensing, properly adopted its own set of Pesticide Enforcement Response Regulations that included a penalty matrix by which the Board determined the nature of a violation and assessed its severity and the appropriate sanction. Ark. State Plant Bd. v. Bullock, 345 Ark. 373, 48 S.W.3d 516 (2001).

Rule of State Plant Board is not void for failure to prescribe a penalty since the penalty is provided by this section. Howard v. State, 154 Ark. 430, 242 S.W. 818 (1922).

Dicamba;

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 15; C. & M. Dig., § 8038; Pope's Dig., § 12346; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-114; Acts 1995, No. 141, § 1; 1995, No. 167, § 1; 1997, No. 317, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 7; 2017, No. 778, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, § 8; 2019, No. 423, § 1.

2-16-204. Actions of agents.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of this subchapter, the act, omission, or failure of any official agent or other person acting for or employed by any person, association, partnership, or corporation within the scope of his or her employment or office shall, in every case, also be deemed the act, omission, or failure of the person, association, partnership, or corporation as well as that of the person.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 16; C. & M. Dig., § 8039; Pope's Dig., § 12347; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-115.

2-16-205. Effect of federal law.

This subchapter shall not be so construed or enforced as to conflict in any way with any act of the United States Congress regulating the movement of plants and plant products in interstate or foreign commerce.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 8040; Pope's Dig., § 12348; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-116.

2-16-206. State Plant Board.

There is created and established a State Plant Board, composed of eighteen (18) members, as follows:

Two (2) nonvoting members designated by the Vice President for Agriculture of the University of Arkansas or his or her designee;

A practical cotton grower, actively engaged in the business, to be appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Plant Food Association, actively engaged in the business, to be appointed by the Governor;

A practical rice grower, actively engaged in the business, to be appointed by the Governor;

A practical horticulturist, actively engaged in the business, to be elected by the Arkansas State Horticultural Society;

A nurseryman, actively engaged in the business, to be elected by the Arkansas Green Industry Association;

A practical seed grower, actively engaged in the business, to be elected by the Arkansas Seed Growers Association;

A pest control operator, actively engaged in the business, to be elected by the Arkansas Pest Management Association, Inc.;

A seed dealer, actively engaged in the business, to be elected by the Arkansas Seed Dealers' Association;

One (1) member representing the Arkansas Bureau of Standards to be appointed by the Arkansas Oil Marketers Association;

A pesticide manufacturer, actively engaged in the business, to be elected by the Arkansas Crop Protection Association Inc.;

One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Agricultural Aviation Association, to be elected by the Arkansas Agricultural Aviation Association;

One (1) member to represent the Arkansas Forestry Association, to be elected by the Arkansas Forestry Association;

Two (2) farmers actively and principally engaged in farming in this state, appointed by the Governor;

One (1) representative of the livestock industry, actively engaged in the business, to be appointed by the Governor; and

One (1) representative of the forage industry, actively engaged in the business, to be appointed by the Governor.

Board members shall serve a term of two (2) years or until such time as a successor has been elected or appointed as herein provided. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for all purposes.

The chair, vice chair, and secretary-treasurer shall be elected by the members of the board. The board shall designate some official or employee of the board to serve as disbursing officer of the board.

Meetings of the board shall be called by the chair or by four (4) members of the board.

The members shall serve without compensation but may receive expense reimbursements in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq. and shall be authorized to provide a suitable office where the meetings of the board may be held and its records kept.

If necessary to provide suitable space for its offices, laboratories, and other needs, the board may buy property, build buildings, or lease property for a period covering not more than fifteen (15) years from the date of lease.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1967, No. 77, § 3; Acts 1971, No. 276, § 2; and Acts 1975, No. 409, § 2, all provided that it was the intent of these acts to add members to the State Plant Board and that the addition of the members would not affect the term of any member then serving on the board. The terms of the members of the board are now arranged so that 16 terms expire every two years.

Acts 1983, No. 691, § 11, provided, in part, that the State Plant Board and its powers, functions, and duties, which had been transferred to the Department of Commerce by Acts 1971, No. 38, § 16, would be separated from the Department of Commerce and would be an independent agency of state government, to function in the same manner it functioned prior to its transfer to the Department of Commerce.

Acts 1993, Nos. 610 and 624, § 1, provided: “The Arkansas Bureau of Standards, created by Act 482 of 1963, as amended, the same being A.C.A.4-18-201 et seq., and its functions, powers, duties, assets, properties, and appropriations are transferred by a type 2 transfer [see §25-2-105] to the State Plant Board.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “eighteen (18)” for “sixteen (16)” in the introductory language of (a); and added (a)(16) and (a)(17).

The 2019 amendment deleted former (2) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; rewrote (1); substituted “Plant Food Association” for “fertilizer and cotton oil mills” in (3); and rewrote (10).

Cross References. Division of Agriculture — Service on boards or commissions, §6-64-106.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1949, No. 327, § 1, provided that all of the powers, duties, functions, and authority vested in the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration governing the manufacture, sale, distribution, inspection, and control of concentrated commercial feeds, commercial fertilizers, and fertilizer materials and cottonseed meal would be transferred to the State Plant Board.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “of the Department of Agriculture” in the introductory language of (c)(1) and in (d); and made stylistic changes.

Cross References. Administration of Soil Amendment Act of 1977,§2-19-404.

Arkansas Feed Law of 1997, §2-37-101 et seq.

Duty to administer and enforce the Fruit and Vegetable Labeling Act of 1947, §2-20-306.

Duty to administer Pesticide Use and Application Act, §20-20-205.

Duty to carry out provisions of Pest Control Law, §17-37-105.

Enforcement of Agricultural Liming Materials Act, §2-19-308.

Fertilizers, §2-19-201 et seq.

Power to investigate and certify to varietal purity and fitness for planting of agricultural seed, rules and regulations, §§2-18-103,2-18-104.

Powers and duties under Agricultural Products Grading Act of 1925, §2-20-101 et seq.

Rule is not invalid because no penalty is prescribed since §2-16-203 prescribes the penalty. Howard v. State, 154 Ark. 430, 242 S.W. 818 (1922).

The State Plant Board was authorized to adopt and promulgate a rule requiring cedar trees infected with rust within a certain distance of an orchard to be cut down, and one disobeying such an order was guilty of a misdemeanor. Howard v. State, 154 Ark. 430, 242 S.W. 818 (1922).

A rule of the State Plant Board prohibiting the sale of infected nursery stock has the force and effect of a statute and should be construed as if it were one. Jacobs v. State, 155 Ark. 95, 243 S.W. 952 (1922).

A.C.R.C. Notes. The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for the public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to §21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See §21-2-703.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1967, No. 77, § 2, provided that the title of the “Chief Inspector of the State Plant Board” would be changed to “Director, State Plant Board” and that the director would perform all powers and duties and assume all responsibilities formerly vested by law in the Chief Inspector of the State Plant Board.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “State Plant Board” for “board” throughout the section; redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and (a)(2)(A), and added (a)(2)(B); and redesignated (b) as (b)(1), and added (b)(2); and added (e).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the first sentence of (d), substituted “carrying out the provisions of this subchapter” for “of the board” and inserted “rule”.

Publisher's Notes. The provisions of this section relating to the disposition of moneys may be affected by §19-5-101 et seq. and by §2-16-104.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 8026; Acts 1929, No. 197, § 1; 1931, No. 73, § 2; 1935, No. 97, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 12335; Acts 1953, No. 408, § 1; 1955, No. 239, § 1; 1961, No. 144, § 1; 1967, No. 77, § 1; 1971, No. 276, § 1; 1975, No. 409, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-103; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 2; 2013, No. 591, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 1056, § 1.

2-16-207. Powers and duties of board.

(1)The State Plant Board shall keep itself informed as to the varieties of insect pests, diseases, and noxious weeds and the origin, locality, nature, and appearance thereof; the manner in which they are disseminated; and the approved methods of treatment and eradication.

Every such insect pest, disease, and noxious weed, and every plant and plant product infested or infected is declared to be a public nuisance.

(1)The board in its rules made under this subchapter shall list the insect pests, diseases, and noxious weeds, of which it shall find that the introduction into or the dissemination within the state should be prevented in order to safeguard the plants and plant products of this state, and the list shall include the plants and plant products or other substances on or in which these pests may be carried.

Every person who has knowledge of the presence of any insect pest, disease, or noxious weed listed as required in this section in the rules made under this subchapter, in or upon any place, shall immediately report it to the board or inspectors thereof, giving such detailed information relative thereto as he or she may have.

Every person who deals in or engages in the sale of plants or plant products shall furnish to the board or its inspectors, when requested, a statement of the names and addresses of the persons from whom and the localities where he or she purchased or obtained the plant and plant products.

(1)The board shall make rules for carrying out the provisions and requirements of this subchapter, including rules under which the inspectors and other employees of the Department of Agriculture shall:

Inspect places, plants and plant products, and things and substances used or connected herewith;

Investigate, control, eradicate, and prevent the dissemination of insect pests, diseases, and noxious weeds; and

Supervise or cause the treatment, cutting, and destruction of infected or infested plants and plant products.

For the purpose of preventing fraud and misrepresentation, the board shall make rules governing the transportation, distribution, or sale of sorghum seed, hybrid corn seed, and other seeds intended for planting.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions and requirements of this subchapter, of the rules made, and notices given pursuant thereto, the board and the inspectors and employees of the department shall have power to enter into or upon any place and to open any bundle, package, or other container of plants or plant products.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, §§ 5, 6, 13; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8028, 8029, 8036; Acts 1937, No. 203, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 12337, 12338, 12344; Acts 1939, No. 40, § 1; 1943, No. 44, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-105, 77-106, 77-112; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 18.

2-16-208. Director of board.

(1)For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter, the State Plant Board shall employ, prescribe the duties of, and fix the compensation for a Director of the State Plant Board.

With the approval of the State Plant Board, the director may employ such inspectors or other employees as may be required and may incur such expenses as may be necessary within the limits of the appropriation made by law.

The State Plant Board shall be subject to all executive orders by the Governor instituting a hiring freeze or restriction applicable to all cabinet-level departments.

(1)The director shall be appointed by the State Plant Board with the approval of the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

(A)The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture.

The secretary shall serve as the liaison between the State Plant Board and the Governor.

(1)The director shall furnish a bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) with sufficient sureties approved by the State Plant Board for the faithful performance of his or her duties of this subchapter and the rules of the State Plant Board.

Any person suffering damage by reason of the acts or omissions of the chief inspector or his or her duly authorized deputies or employees may bring action on the bond for damages.

The State Plant Board may require to indemnify the director that similar bonds shall be furnished by deputies, inspectors, or employees.

The State Plant Board shall cooperate with other departments, boards, and officers of this state and of the United States as far as possible.

The secretary shall not be appointed to the position of director.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 8027; Acts 1921, No. 664, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 12336; Acts 1953, No. 360, § 1; 1983, No. 691, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-103.2, 77-104; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 19.

2-16-209. Transportation, etc., of insect pests, etc., generally.

Transportation through or into or transportation, distribution, or sale within the state of any insect pest, plant disease, noxious weed, or any plant, plant product, or other substance, listed in the rules of the State Plant Board as required under §2-16-207, or of sorghum seed, hybrid corn seed, or other planting seeds for the transportation, distribution, or sale of which the board has made rules under this subchapter is prohibited except under such safeguards as may be provided for in the rules of the board.

To cover expenses incident to inspection or treatment or incident to the issuance of such permits or certificates as may be required by the board's rules made under this subchapter, the board may require the payment of reasonable fees which shall be deposited in the manner prescribed by §2-16-210 to be used in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

The board is empowered to require that a shipper who ships plants from another state into Arkansas must meet any and all requirements which the shipper's state would make of an Arkansas shipper who ships plants into that state.

Inspectors carrying out the provisions of this subchapter on issuance of a written notice may cause to be held or to be sent out of the state or to be destroyed any plant, plant product, or other substance which has been brought into or is being transported within the state in violation of any state or federal law, rule, or regulation. They may stop and detain for inspection any person, car, or other carrier.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 11; C. & M. Dig., § 8034; Acts 1929, No. 197, § 3; 1937, No. 203, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 12342; Acts 1939, No. 40, § 2; 1943, No. 44, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-110; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 20.

2-16-210. Certificate of inspection required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, give away, carry, ship, or deliver for carriage or shipment, within this state, any plants or plant products listed as required by this subchapter unless the plants and plant products have been officially inspected and a certificate has been issued by an inspector of the State Plant Board. This certificate shall state that the plants or plant products have been inspected and found to be apparently free from insect pests and diseases. It shall also be unlawful for any person to sell, give away, carry, ship, or deliver for carriage any plants or plant products unless the plants or plant products bear a certificate issued by an inspector of the board. This certificate shall show that the place on which the plants or plant products were grown has been inspected and found to be apparently free from insect pests and diseases and any other facts provided for in the rules made under this subchapter.

This section shall not apply to plants and plant products not affected by rules made under §2-16-211 when the plants or plant products are disposed of in local trade.

When any person shall notify the board of impending shipments of plants or plant products and the board fails to provide the proper inspector to inspect the plants or plant products under the rules made under this subchapter, the person desiring to make the shipment may do so without being liable to provisions of this section.

For the issuance of the certificate as provided for in this section, the board may require the payment of a reasonable fee to cover the expenses of the inspection and certification. If it shall be found at any time that a certificate of inspection, issued or accepted under the provisions of this section, is being used in connection with plants and plant products which are infested or infected with insect pests or diseases, its further use may be prohibited, subject to such inspection and other disposition of the plants and plant products involved as may be provided for by the board.

All moneys collected by the board under this section or under §2-16-211 or §2-16-214 shall be deposited with the treasurer of the board and shall be used in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 8032; Pope's Dig., § 12340; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-108.

2-16-211. Eradication of pests, diseases, or noxious weeds.

Whenever the inspection discloses that any places, plants, plant products, or things and substances used or connected therewith, are infested or infected with any insect pest, disease, or noxious weed, listed, as required by §2-16-207 in rules made under this subchapter, written notice thereof shall be given the owner or other person in possession or control of the place where found, and the owner or other person shall proceed to control, eradicate, or prevent the dissemination of the insect pest, disease, or noxious weed. The owner shall then remove, cut, or destroy infested or infected plants and plant products or things and substances used or connected therewith, within the time and in the manner prescribed by the notice or the rules made under this subchapter.

Whenever the owner or other person cannot be found or shall fail, neglect, or refuse to obey the requirements of the notice and the rules made under this subchapter, the requirements shall be carried out by the inspector or other employees of the State Plant Board. The board shall have and enforce a lien for the expenses thereof against the place in which or upon which the expenses were incurred in the same manner as liens are had and enforced upon buildings, lots, wharves, and piers for labor and materials furnished by virtue of contract with the owner.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 414, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 8030; Acts 1937, No. 203, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 12339; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-107.